Maryland, session 2025, HB1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
19–118.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROPERTY AND CASUALTY LOSS RATIO” MEANS THE
INSURER’S INCURRED CLAIMS FOR THE YEAR DIVIDED BY THE INSURER’S PREMIUM
REVENUE FOR THE REPORTING YEAR.
(B) THE MINIMUM ACCEPTABLE PROPERTY AND CASUALTY LOSS RATIO
DURING A POLICY YEAR IS 85%.
(C) FOR EACH POLICY YEAR, IF AN INSURER’S PROPERTY AND CASUALTY
LOSS RATIO DOES NOT MEET OR EXCEED THE MINIMUM ACCEPTABLE PROPERTY
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1159*

HOUSE BILL 1159
AND CASUALTY LOSS RATIO ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE INSURER SHALL PROVIDE A REBATE TO EACH INSURED IN AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF:
(1) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF PREMIUM REVENUE RECEIVED BY THE
INSURER FROM THE INSURED, AFTER:
(I) SUBTRACTING FEDERAL AND STATE TAXES AND LICENSING
AND REGULATORY FEES; AND
(II) ACCOUNTING FOR PAYMENTS OR RECEIPTS FOR RISK
ADJUSTMENT AND REINSURANCE; AND
(2) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE MINIMUM ACCEPTABLE
PROPERTY AND CASUALTY LOSS RATIO ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION AND THE INSURER’S ACTUAL PROPERTY AND CASUALTY LOSS RATIO.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.